Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska34-103
Maintenance; private nuisance.

Every person
liable to contribute to the construction and maintenance of a division fence
or any portion thereof shall maintain his or her portion in good repair, including
the necessary removal or trimming of trees and woody growth within or encroaching
upon the fenceline to repair or avoid damage to, or dislocation of, the division
fence. The occurrence of trees and woody growth within or encroaching upon
a division fence that causes damage to, or dislocation of, the fence shall
constitute a private nuisance to the adjacent landowner's possessory interests
in his or her land.

Laws 2011, LB108, § 1.